languages/apertium-nog/tests/px3cases.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-lookup
    Gen: ../nog.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../nog.automorf.hfst

Tests:
  "[twol] px3.nom":
    ис<n><px3sp><nom> : иси
    район<n><px3sp><nom> : районы

  "[twol] px3.acc":
    ис<n><px3sp><acc> : исин
    район<n><px3sp><acc> : районын

  "[twol] px3.gen":
    ис<n><px3sp><gen> : исининъ
    район<n><px3sp><gen> : районынынъ

  "[twol] px3.dat":
    ис<n><px3sp><dat> : исине
    район<n><px3sp><dat> : районына

  "[twol] px3.loc":
    ис<n><px3sp><loc> : исинде
    район<n><px3sp><loc> : районында

  "[twol] px3.abl":
    ис<n><px3sp><abl> : исиннен
    район<n><px3sp><abl> : районыннан
